Wisconsin, session 2025, AB592.
do enact as follows:AB592,12Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB592,2,121(1) Professional development for science teachers; pilot. In the 2025-226 and 2026-27 school years, the department of public instruction shall, in 3collaboration with nonprofit organizations located in this state that offer 4professional development to individuals who teach science to pupils in grades 5kindergarten to 12, develop and implement a program to provide professional 6development opportunities to individuals who teach science to pupils in grades 7kindergarten to 12 in this state. As part of the program developed under this 8subsection, if science equipment is related to or the subject of a professional 9development opportunity provided under the program, the department of public 10instruction may provide, at no cost, the science equipment to the individuals who 11participate in the professional development opportunity for use at the schools at 12which the individuals teach science.AB592,2,1913(2) Report. By no later than October 1, 2027, the department of public 14instruction shall submit to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for 15distribution to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2) a report on the program 16implemented under sub. (1) that includes the number of individuals who received 17professional development under the program, science equipment provided to 18participants for use in the classroom, and each organization that provided 19professional development opportunities under the program.AB592,3,220(3) Funding request. By no later than 45 days after the effective date of this 21subsection, the department of public instruction shall submit a request to the joint 22committee on finance to supplement the appropriation under s. 20.255 (1) (eb) with 23the funding that was provided in the joint committee on finance supplemental 1appropriation under s. 20.865 (4) (a) for professional development for science 2teachers under 2025 Wisconsin Act 15.AB592,3,33